nb: Opptakskvalitet: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
sl-SI: Kakovost snemanja: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Drugo
en: Recording quality: High; Low; Medium; Other
th: คุณภาพการบันทึก: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
sv: Inspelningskvalitet: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
es: Calidad de grabación: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otros
hr-HR: Kvaliteta snimanja: Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Ostalo
nl: Opnamekwaliteit: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Andere
hu: Felvételi minőség: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
bg-BG: Качество на записа: Високо; Ниско; Средно; Други
cs: Kvalita záznamu: Vysoký; Nízký; Médium; Jiné
zh-TW: 錄音品質: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
vi: Chất lượng ghi âm: Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Khác
de: Aufnahmequalität: Hoch; Niedrig; Medium; Sonstiges
it: Qualità di registrazione: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
fr: Qualité d’enregistrement: Haute; Basse; Moyen; Autre
pt-BR: Qualidade de gravação: Alta; Baixa; Médio; Outro
ru: Качество записи: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другое
ro-RO: Calitatea înregistrării: Ridicată; Redusă; Medie; Altele
fi: Tallennuslaatu: Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Muu
ja: 録音品質: 高; 低; 媒体; その他
zh-CN: 录音质量: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
lt-LT: Įrašo kokybė: Aukšta; Prasta; Vidutinė; Kita
pt-PT: Qualidade de gravação: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
pl: Jakość nagrywania: Wysoki; Niski; Środek; Inne
tr: Kayıt Kalitesi: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
da: Optagelseskvalitet: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
ko: 녹음 품질: 높음; 낮음; 매체; 기타
el: Ποιότητα εγγραφής: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Άλλο
sk-SK: Kvalita záznamu: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné